Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB199.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 613.1. General Appropriation Bill Timeline.--(a) A 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 member of the Senate and a member of the House of Representatives shall introduce a general appropriation bill for a fiscal year in the member's chamber no later than six weeks after the date of submission of the budget by the Governor to the General Assembly.(b) Each chamber of the General Assembly shall pass a complete and balanced general appropriation bill no later than the second full week of May.(c) If no complete and balanced general appropriation bill has been passed by the General Assembly and submitted to the Governor for signing by June 15 and if either the Senate or the House of Representatives has passed a complete and balanced general appropriation bill, the other chamber that has not passed a complete and balanced general appropriation bill must vote on the complete and balanced general appropriation bill passed by the other chamber.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0199PN0149 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617